Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.535.070

Notice to county treasurer of authority to issue bonds—Annual levy for payment of interest and principal on bonds—Penalty against officer for expenditures in excess of revenues.

When authorized to issue bonds, as provided in this chapter the board of directors shall immediately cause to be sent to the appropriate county treasurer, notice thereof. The county officials charged by law with the duty of levying taxes for the payment of said bonds and interest shall do so as provided in RCW 39.46.110.

The annual expense of such district shall not thereafter exceed the annual revenue thereof, and any officer of such district who shall knowingly aid in increasing the annual expenditure in excess of the annual revenue of such district, in addition to any other penalties, whether civil or criminal, as provided by law, shall be deemed to be guilty of a misdemeanor, and shall be punished by a fine not exceeding five hundred dollars.

[ 1985 c 7 s 90; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.52.070. Prior: 1909 c 97 p 335 s 8; RRS s 4963; prior: 1897 c 118 s 135; 1895 c 21 s 8. Formerly RCW 28A.52.070, 28.52.070.]